Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3125
Provisional license; expiration.

A provisional license to practice psychology expires upon receipt of a license to practice psychology or two years after the date of issuance, whichever occurs first.

Laws 1999, LB 366, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.35;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1059.